Maryland, session 2026, HB0332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. ACTION FOR DEPRIVATION OF CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS.
3–2701.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “LAW” INCLUDES:
(1) THE U.S. CONSTITUTION;
(2) THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0332*

HOUSE BILL 332
(3) THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION;
(4) THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES; AND
(5) THE LAWS OF MARYLAND.
3–2702.
(A) (1) AN AGGRIEVED PARTY MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO, UNDER COLOR OF LAW, DEPRIVES THE AGGRIEVED PARTY OR
CAUSES OR ALLOWS THE AGGRIEVED PARTY TO BE DEPRIVED OF A RIGHT, A
PRIVILEGE, OR AN IMMUNITY SECURED BY THE U.S. CONSTITUTION.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IN AN ACTION
UNDER THIS SECTION, AN AGGRIEVED PARTY MAY SEEK DAMAGES AND
DECLARATORY AND INJUNCTIVE RELIEF.
(3) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION AGAINST A JUDICIAL
OFFICER, INJUNCTIVE RELIEF IS AVAILABLE ONLY IF A DECLARATORY JUDGMENT
IS VIOLATED OR DECLARATORY RELIEF IS UNAVAILABLE.
(B) (1) A DEFENDANT IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY ASSERT A
DEFENSE OF ABSOLUTE OR QUALIFIED IMMUNITY TO THE SAME EXTENT AS A
PERSON SUED UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1983 UNDER LIKE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(2) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO WAIVE OR ABROGATE
ANY DEFENSE OF SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY OTHERWISE AVAILABLE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE FEES AND COSTS, INCLUDING ATTORNEY’S FEES
AND EXPERT WITNESS FEES, TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) A COURT MAY NOT AWARD FEES OR COSTS UNDER THIS SECTION
AGAINST A JUDICIAL OFFICER UNLESS THE JUDICIAL OFFICER ACTED CLEARLY IN
EXCESS OF THE JUDICIAL OFFICER’S JURISDICTION.
(D) AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE FILED WITHIN 3 YEARS
AFTER THE CAUSE OF ACTION ACCRUES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to any
civil action pending on the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.